Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1531
Intervenor; appeal.

If, after any hearing as provided by section 44-1528 or 44-1532, the report of the director does not charge a violation of the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act, then any intervenor as provided by section 44-1528 may, within ten days after the service of such report, appeal the findings of the director. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. Upon such appeal, the court may issue appropriate orders and decrees in connection therewith, including, if the court finds that it is in the interest of the public, orders enjoining and restraining the continuance of any act or practice which it finds, notwithstanding such report of the director, constitutes a violation of the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act and containing penalties pursuant to section 44-1529.

Laws 1973, LB 349, § 10;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 61;

Laws 1991, LB 234, § 13.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.